ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > 生理用品 > ナプキン: マタニティナプキン; 生理用ナプキン; 夜用ナプキン; パンティライナー; レギュラー生理用ナプキン; 再利用可能なクロス
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Női egészségügyi kellékek > Női betétek és protektorok: Kismamabetétek és protektorok; Női betétek és protektorok; Éjszakai betétek és protektorok; Betétek; Hagyományos betétek és protektorok; Újrahasználható ruhák
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Γυναικεία είδη υγιεινής > Γυναικείες σερβιέτες & προστατευτικά: Πάνες λοχείας & προστατευτικά επιθέματα εγκυμοσύνης; Σερβιέτες & προστατευτικά περιόδου; Σερβιέτες νυκτός & προστατευτικά; Λεπτές σερβιέτες; Κανονικές σερβιέτες & προστατευτικά; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμα ρούχα
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Ženski higienski pripomočki > Ženski vložki in ščitniki perila: Vložki in ščitniki perila za nosečnice; Vložki in ščitniki perila za menstruacijo; Nočni vložki in ščitniki perila; Dnevni vložki; Standardni vložki in ščitniki perila; Oblačila za večkratno uporabo
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Suprimentos para a higiene feminina > Absorventes e protetores femininos: Absorventes e protetores para maternidade; Absorventes e protetores menstruais; Absorventes e protetores noturnos; Protetores de calcinha; Absorventes e protetores regulares; Roupas reutilizáveis
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Artigos sanitários femininos > Compressas e protetores femininos: Compressas e protetores de maternidade; Compressas e protetores menstruais; Compressas e protetores noturnos; Pensos higiénicos para incontinência; Compressas e protetores normais; Roupa reutilizável
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Kuukautissuojat > Kuukautisiteet ja -suojat: Äitiyssiteet ja -suojat; Kuukautissiteet ja -suojat; Yösiteet ja -suojat; Pikkuhousunsuojat; Tavalliset kuukautissiteet ja -suojat; Uudelleenkäytettävät vaatteet
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Moteriškos higienos priemonės > Moteriški įklotai ir apsauginės priemonės: Nėščiųjų įklotai ir apsauginės priemonės; Menstruaciniai įklotai ir apsauginės priemonės; Naktiniai įklotai ir apsauginės priemonės; Kelnaičių įklotai; Įprasti įklotai ir apsauginės priemonės; Daugkartinio naudojimo drabužiai
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Женская гигиена > Женские гигиенические прокладки: Послеродовые прокладки; Менструальные прокладки; Ночные прокладки; Ежедневные прокладки; Обычные прокладки; Многоразовые тканевые прокладки
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Дамски санитарни консумативи > Дамски превръзки и протектори: Превръзки и протектори за бременни; Менструални превръзки и протектори; Нощни превръзки и протектори; Ежедневни превръзки; Обикновени превръзки и протектори; Превръзки за многократна употреба
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Kadın Hijyen Ürünleri > Kadın Pedleri: Hamile Pedleri ve Koruyucuları; Regl Pedleri ve Koruyucuları; Gecelik Pedler ve Koruyucular; Külot Torbaları; Normal Pedler ve Koruyucular; Yeniden Kullanılabilir Giysiler
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Productos sanitarios femeninos > Compresas y protectores femeninos: Discos absorbentes y protectores; Compresas y protectores menstruales; Compresas y protectores para la noche; Salvaslips; Compresas y protectores normales; Toallitas reutilizables
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Sản phẩm vệ sinh phụ nữ > Băng và bỉm vệ sinh phụ nữ: Băng và bỉm vệ sinh cho bà bầu; Băng và bỉm vệ sinh kỳ kinh nguyệt; Băng và bỉm vệ sinh qua đêm; Băng vệ sinh hằng ngày; Băng và bỉm vệ sinh thông thường; Băng vệ sinh vải
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Kvinnlig intimhygien > Bindor och trosskydd: Mammabindor och trosskydd; Mensskydd och bindor; Nattskydd och bindor; Trosskydd; Vanliga bindor och trosskydd; Återanvändbara tyger
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 女性卫生用品 > 卫生巾: 产褥垫/护理垫; 月经垫/护理垫; 夜间护垫/护理垫; 卫生护垫; 常规护垫/护理垫; 可重复使用的棉布
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Feminine Sanitary Supplies > Feminine Pads & Protectors: Maternity Pads & Protectors; Menstrual Pads & Protectors; Overnight Pads & Protectors; Panty Liners; Regular Pads & Protectors; Reusable Clothes
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Sanitærutstyr for kvinner > Sanitetsbind og truseinnlegg: Sanitetsbind og truseinnlegg for gravide kvinner; Menstruasjonsbind og truseinnlegg; Nattbind og beskyttelse for kvinner; Truseinnlegg; Vanlige sanitetsbind og truseinnlegg; Gjenbrukbare klær
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Accessori sanitari femminili > Assorbenti e proteggi slip: Assorbenti e protezioni premaman; Assorbenti e protezioni mestruali; Assorbenti e protezioni per la notte; Salvaslip; Assorbenti e protezioni normali; Biancheria riutilizzabile
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Ženska higijena > Ženski ulošci i zaštita: Ulošci i zaštita za trudnice; Menstrualni ulošci i zaštita; Noćni ulošci i zaštita; Dnevni ulošci; Standardni ulošci i zaštita; Višekratne krpe
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Produits d’hygiène féminine > Serviettes hygiéniques et protège-slips: Serviettes hygiéniques et protège-slips de maternité; Serviettes hygiéniques et protège-slips menstruels; Serviettes hygiéniques et protège-slips de nuit; Protège-slips; Serviettes et protège-slips classiques; Serviettes lavables en tissu
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 女性衛生用品 > 衛生棉: 衛生棉/護墊; 量多型衛生棉/護墊; 夜用型衛生棉/護墊; 衛生護墊; 一般型衛生棉/護墊; 可重複使用布質護墊
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 여성 위생 용품 > 여성용 패드: 임산부용 패드; 생리대; 오버나이트 패드; 팬티 라이너; 일반 패드; 다회용 천
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Dámské toaletní potřeby > Dámské hygienické vložky: Těhotenské vložky; Menstruační vložky; Noční vložky; Slipové vložky; Běžné hygienické vložky; Opakovaně použitelné létkové vložky
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Damenhygieneartikel > Slipeinlagen & Binden: Schwangerschaftseinlagen & -Binden; Menstruationseinlagen & -Binden; Menstruationseinlagen & -Binden über Nacht; Slipeinlagen; Normale Slipeinlagen & Binden; Wiederverwendbare Kleidung
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Menstruatieproducten > Maandverband: Kraamverband; Menstruatieverband; Nachtverband; Inlegkruisjes; Normaal verband; Herbruikbare kleding
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > อุปกรณ์เกี่ยวกับสุขอนามัยของผู้หญิง > ผ้าอนามัยและแผ่นอนามัย: ผ้าอนามัยและแผ่นอนามัยหลังคลอด; ผ้าอนามัยและแผ่นอนามัยสำหรับประจำเดือน; ผ้าอนามัยและแผ่นอนามัยใส่ตลอดคืน; แผ่นอนามัย; ผ้าอนามัยและแผ่นอนามัยแบบทั่วไป; ผ้าที่ใช้ซ้ำได้
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Produse de igienă feminină > Absorbante și protecții pentru femei: Absorbante și protecții pentru gravide; Absorbante și protecții pentru ciclul menstrual; Absorbante și protecții de noapte; Absorbante zilnice; Absorbante și protecții obișnuite; Articole vestimentare reutilizabile
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hygiejneartikler til kvinder > Hygiejnebind: Barselsindlæg og -beskyttere; Menstruationsindlæg og -beskyttere; Natindlæg og -beskyttere; Trusseindlæg; Almindelige indlæg og beskyttere; Genanvendeligt tøj
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Środki do higieny intymnej dla kobiet > Podpaski i wkładki higieniczne: Podpaski i ochraniacze ciążowe; Podpaski i ochraniacze menstruacyjne; Podkładki i ochraniacze na noc; Wkładki higieniczne; Zwykłe podkładki i ochraniacze; Ściereczki wielokrotnego użytku
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Dámske hygienické potreby > Dámske hygienické a intímne vložky: Tehotenské a intímne vložky; Menštruačné a intímne vložky; Nočné a intímne vložky; Slipové vložky; Bežné a intímne vložky; Menštruačné nohavičky